es: Era geológica: Cenozoico; Mesozoico; Paleozoico; Precámbrico; Otros
pt-PT: Era geológica: Cenozoico; Mesozóico; Paleozoico; Pré-Cambriano; Outro
hu: Geológiai korszak: Kainozoikum; Mezozoikum; Paleozoikum; Prekambrium; Egyéb
pt-BR: Era geológica: Cenozóico; Mesozóico; Paleozóico; Pré-cambriano; Outro
en: Geological era: Cenozoic; Mesozoic; Paleozoic; Precambrian; Other
sl-SI: Geološka doba: Kenozoik; Mezozoik; Paleozoik; Predkambrij; Drugo
fi: Geologinen aikakausi: Kenotsooinen; Mesotsooinen; Paleosooinen; Prekambri; Muu
ko: 지질 시대: 신생대; 중생대; 고생대; 선캄브리아기; 기타
ro-RO: Era geologică: Cenozoic; Mesozoic; Paleozoic; Precambrian; Altele
hr-HR: Geološka era: Kenozoik; Mezozoik; Paleozoik; Prekambrij; Ostalo
ru: Геологическая эра: Кайнозой; Мезозой; Палеозой; Докембрий; Другой
sk-SK: Geologická éra: Kenozoikum; Mezozoikum; Paleozoikum; Prekambrium; Iné
cs: Geologické období: Kenozoikum; Mezozoikum; Paleozoikum; Prekambrium; Jiné
th: ยุคทางธรณีวิทยา: ซีโนโซอิก; มีโซโซอิก; พาลีโอโซอิก; พรีแคมเบรียน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Геоложка ера: Кайнозойски; Мезозойски; Палеозойски; Прекамбрий; Други
tr: Jeolojik Çağ: Senozoik; Mezozoik; Paleozoik; Prekambriyen; Diğer
zh-CN: 地质时代: 新生代; 中生代; 古生代; 前寒武纪; 其他
sv: Geologisk era: Kenozoikum; Mesozoikum; Paleozoikum; Prekambrium; Övrigt
el: Γεωλογική εποχή: Καινοζωική; Μεσοζωική; Παλαιοζωική; Προκάμβρια; Άλλο
zh-TW: 地質時代: 新生代; 中生代; 古生代; 前寒武紀; 其他
da: Geologisk æra: Cenozoikum; Mesozoikum; Palæozoikum; Prækambrium; Andet
pl: Era geologiczna: Kenozoik; Mezozoik; Paleozoik; Prekambr; Inne
vi: Kỷ địa chất: Đại Tân sinh; Đại Trung sinh; Đại Cổ sinh; Tiền Cambri; Khác
lt-LT: Geologinė era: Kainozojus; Mezozojus; Paleozojus; Prekambras; Kita
nl: Geologisch tijdperk: Cenozoïcum; Mesozoïcum; Paleozoïcum; Precambrium; Andere
nb: Geologisk æra: Kenozoikum; Mesozoikum; Paleozoikum; Prekambrium; Annet
de: Erdzeitalter: Känozoikum; Mesozoikum; Paläozoikum; Präkambrium; Sonstiges
it: Era geologica: Cenozoico; Mesozoico; Paleozoico; Precambriano; Altro
ja: 地質時代: 新生代; 中生代; 古生代; 先カンブリア時代; その他
fr: Ère géologique: Cénozoïque; Mésozoïque; Paléozoïque; Précambrien; Autre